California, session 20252026, AB2540.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 99250 of the Education Code is amended to read:99250. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Commission” means the Commission on the Status of Women and Girls established by Section 8241 of the Government Code.(b) “Community college” means a college of the California Community Colleges system or a community college district that maintains the college.(c) “Fund” means the College Student Health Center Sexual and Reproductive Health Preparation Fund established by Section 99251.(d) “Grantee” means any qualifying student health center at a public college or university.(e) “Medication abortion readiness” includes, but is not limited to, assessment of each individual clinic to determine facility and training needs before beginning to provide abortion by medication techniques, purchasing equipment, making facility improvements, establishing clinical protocols, creating patient educational materials, and training staff. “Medication abortion readiness” does not include the provision of abortion by medication techniques.(f) “Public university student health center” means a clinic providing primary health care services to students that is located on the campus of a university within the University of California or California State University systems.(g) “Public university system” means the University of California or the California State University.SEC. 2. Section 99251 of the Education Code is amended to read:99251. (a) On and after January 1, 2023, each public university student health center shall offer abortion by medication techniques onsite. This service may be performed by providers on staff at the student health center, through telehealth services, or by providers associated with a contracted external agency.(b) (1) The commission shall administer the College Student Health Center Sexual and Reproductive Health Preparation Fund, which is established by this chapter for the purposes of providing private moneys in the form of direct allocations to the University of California and the California State University to support medication abortion readiness at each public university student health center. Notwithstanding any other law, the commission may receive moneys from nonstate entities, including, but not limited to, private sector entities and local and federal government agencies, specifically to support the fund, and deposit these moneys into the fund.(2) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the commission for allocation for purposes of this subdivision.(3) The commission shall use fund moneys to do all of the following:(A) Allocate two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) per campus to the University of California and the California State University. Of these funds, each university system shall provide two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to each public university student health center to pay for the cost, both direct and indirect, of medication abortion readiness. Allowable expenses payable from these allocations may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:(i) Purchase of equipment used in the provision of abortion by medication techniques.(ii) Facility and security upgrades.(iii) Costs associated with enabling the campus health center to deliver telehealth services.(iv) Costs associated with training staff in the provision of abortion by medication techniques.(v) Staff cost reimbursement and clinical revenue offset while staff are in trainings.(B) Allocate two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to both the University of California and the California State University, to pay for the cost, both direct and indirect, of medication abortion readiness for each university system. Allowable expenses payable from these allocations may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:(i) Providing 24-hour, backup medical support by telephone to patients who have obtained abortion by medication techniques at a public university student health center.(ii) One-time fees associated with establishing a corporate account to provide telehealth services.(iii) Billing specialist consultation.(C) Maintain a system of financial reporting on all aspects of the fund. The financial reports shall include, but not be limited to, information from public university student health centers on their expenditures and activities associated with this chapter.(D) Support implementation of medication abortion readiness by public university student health centers by measures that may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:(i) Assisting student health centers with planning and budgeting.(ii) Coordinating with student health centers to identify training and other resources.(iii) Serving as a liaison between each public university system, public university student health centers, and the Legislature.(iv) Collecting, compiling, and analyzing information from public university student health centers to meet the commission’s reporting requirements under subdivision (e).(E) Pay direct and indirect costs of the commission to administer this chapter, including costs of the hiring of staff.(4) The requirements of this chapter shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, a total of at least ten million two hundred ninety thousand dollars ($10,290,000) in private funds is made available to the fund in a timely manner on or after January 1, 2020. It is the intent of the Legislature that both of the following occur:(A) No General Fund moneys shall be appropriated, or otherwise provided, to support the fund or the commission’s costs to administer this chapter.(B) The commission shall assist public university student health centers in identifying other resources to pay for the costs of medication abortion readiness, and for the costs of providing for abortion by medication techniques.(5) Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted as requiring either of the following:(A) A public university to use General Fund moneys or student fees for medication abortion readiness.(B) A public university student health center to bill public programs or health insurance providers to support the costs of providing abortion by medication techniques onsite.(c) Upon request from a public university student health center, the commission shall assist and advise on potential pathways for the student health center to bill public programs and health insurance providers to help pay for the costs of providing abortion by medication techniques.(d) On or before January 1, 2028, public university student health centers shall promote awareness of the services for abortion by medication techniques that the student health center offers, provide information on those services to students, and post the availability of those services on its internet website.(e) (1) On or before December 31, 2021, and on or before December 31 of each year thereafter until December 31, 2026, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following information for each reporting period, separately for each public university system:(A) The number of student health centers that provide abortion by medication techniques.(B) The number of abortions by medication techniques performed at student health centers, disaggregated, to the extent possible, by student health center.(C) The total amount of funds received by each system and provided to the system’s student health centers that is expended on medication abortion readiness, and, separately, the total amount of any other funds expended on medication abortion readiness and the source of those funds, disaggregated by function and, to the extent possible, disaggregated by student health center.(2) The report required in paragraph (1), and any associated data collection, shall be conducted in accordance with state and federal privacy law, including, but not limited to, the Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1 of the Civil Code), the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g), and the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191).(3) The requirement for submitting reports under paragraph (1) shall become inoperative on January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.SEC. 3. Section 99252 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 99251, to read:99252. (a) On and after January 1, 2029, a community college that has a student health center shall do both of the following:(1) (A) Offer access to abortion by medication techniques. This service may be performed by providers on staff at the student health center, through telehealth services, by providers associated with a contracted external agency, or through partnerships with other community health providers, as appropriate.(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), a community college shall be deemed to provide access through a partnership with a community health provider if the community college student health center has established a written referral relationship, memorandum of understanding, or contract with one or more licensed providers capable of providing abortion by medication techniques.(C) A community college may satisfy the requirement in subparagraph (A) by providing information, facilitating referrals or warm handoffs, assisting students in identifying support resources, or maintaining current referral information for participating providers.(2) Promote awareness of the services for abortion by medication techniques that the student health center offers access to, provide that information to students, and post the availability of those services on its internet website.(b) (1) Upon request from a community college student health center, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall assist and advise on potential pathways for the student health center to bill public programs and health insurance providers to help pay for the costs of providing access to abortion by medication techniques.(2) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges may enter into a statewide agreement with a health provider to provide community college student health centers with the services and resources needed to meet the requirements of this section.(c) (1) On or before January 1, 2030, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that includes, but is not limited to, the following information separately for each community college:(A) The number of student health centers that provide abortion by medication techniques, provide access to medication abortion techniques through other providers, or both.(B) The number of abortions by medication techniques performed at student health centers or assisted through student health centers, disaggregated, to the extent possible, by student health center.(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2032.(d) (1) The commission, in consultation with the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, shall develop a standardized reporting framework that minimizes administrative burden and protects student privacy.(2) (A) A community college student health center shall only be required to report information that is reasonably available through its existing operations and records.(B) This section does not require a community college district or student health center to collect protected health information from an external provider, track services delivered by an external provider beyond information voluntarily provided by a student or the provider, or establish new clinical data systems for the sole purpose of meeting the reporting requirements of this section.(d)(e) The implementation of this section is contingent upon an appropriation for its purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute. statute to support the cost, both direct and indirect, of meeting the requirements of this section. Funds appropriated for purposes of this section may be used for implementation readiness activities and ongoing operational costs, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) Telehealth infrastructure and technology.(2) Contracts with external providers and community partners.(3) Clinical staffing, prescribing services, and medical oversight.(4) Staff training and professional development.(5) Administrative and legal support.(6) Insurance billing consultation and infrastructure.(7) Student outreach and educational materials.(8) Data collection and reporting.(9) Other direct and indirect costs reasonably necessary to implement this section.